Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB974.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 703 of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, is amended to read:Section 703. Written requests.(a) Process.--A written request for access to records may be submitted in person, by mail, by e-mail, by facsimile or, to the extent provided by agency rules, by any other electronic means. A written request must be addressed to the open-records officer designated pursuant to section 502. Employees of an agency shall 123456789101112131415161718192021 be directed to forward requests for records to the open-records officer. A written request [should] must identify or describe the records sought with sufficient specificity to enable the agency to ascertain which records are being requested and shall include the name and address to which the agency should address its response. A written request need not include any explanation of the requester's reason for requesting or intended use of the records unless otherwise required by law.(b) Specificity consideration.--In determining whether a request has sufficient specificity under this section, an open records officer may consider:(1) the burden on the agency to conduct a good faith effort under section 901 to fully review and to redact any records within the time periods required by this act;(2) the potential harm to privacy or proprietary interests of any third party if a full good faith effort cannot reasonably be conducted within the time periods required by this act; and(3) the requirements under any Federal or State law related to disclosing records and the harm or penalties under the law if records are or may be improperly released.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0974PN1057 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122